Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.440

Annual report by secretary of state.

(1) Annually, the secretary of state shall publish a report indicating:

(a) For each charitable organization registered under RCW 19.09.075 the percentage relationship between (i) the total amount of money applied to charitable purposes; and (ii) the dollar value of total expenditures, including the total amount of money applied to charitable purposes, fund-raising costs, and administrative expenses;

(b) For each commercial fund-raiser registered under RCW 19.09.079 the percentage relationship between (i) the amount of money disbursed to charitable organizations for charitable purposes; and (ii) the total value of contributions received on behalf of charitable organizations by the commercial fund-raiser; and

(c) Such other information as the secretary of state deems appropriate.

(2) The secretary of state may use the latest information obtained pursuant to RCW 19.09.075, 19.09.079, or otherwise under chapter 19.09 RCW to prepare the report.

[ 2007 c 471 s 10; 1993 c 471 s 42.]